Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-580
Boundaries; change; protest petition; requisite number of signers; dismissal of original petition.

If the board of directors of such district shall find from the evidence that the protesting petition is signed by the requisite number of owners of lands, the board of directors of such district shall forthwith dismiss the original petition praying for the annexation of the tract or tracts of land to be annexed and included in such district. The finding of the board of directors of such district upon said question of the genuineness of the signatures, and all matters of law and fact incident to such determination shall be final and conclusive on all parties in interest whether appearing or not.

Laws 1951, c. 147, § 7, p. 592.